Utah statutes.
17-53-307.   County purchasing agent -- Appointment -- Compensation -- Oath -- Supervision --  Duties.

(1)  The county executive, with the advice and consent of the county legislative body, in each county having a taxable value in excess of $500,000,000 may appoint a county purchasing agent.

(2)  The agent shall qualify by taking, subscribing, and filing the constitutional oath and giving bond to the county in a sum fixed by the county legislative body.

(3) (a)  The county purchasing agent shall, under the direction and supervision of the county executive and except as provided in Subsection (3)(b):

(i)  negotiate for the purchase of or contract for all supplies and materials required by the county;

(ii)  submit all contracts and purchases negotiated by the purchasing agent under Subsection (3)(a)(i) to the county executive for approval and ratification; and

(iii)  keep an accurate and complete record of all purchases and a detailed disposition of them and, when required by the county legislative body, make a complete and detailed report to it of business transacted.

(b)  Subject to Subsection (3)(c), the county executive may structure the county purchasing agent's office so that:

(i)  the county purchasing agent's office is physically located within the county auditor's office; and

(ii)  the county purchasing agent receives direction and supervision from the county auditor.

(c)  The county executive:

(i)  may not structure the county purchasing agent's office as described in Subsection (3)(b) unless:

(A)  the county executive receives the advice and consent of the county council; and

(B)  the county executive and county auditor agree, in writing, to the proposed structure, including the level of direction and supervision of the county purchasing agent retained by the county executive; and

(ii)  shall maintain the level of direction and supervision over the county purchasing agent as agreed upon with the county auditor.

(4)  The county executive may exclude from the purchasing agent's responsibility a county clerk's duties concerning elections or a sheriff's duties under Section 17-22-8.



Amended by Chapter 140, 2011 General Session

